Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 1 GENERAL AND ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS
40-2-129. New resource acquisitions - factors in determination - local employment - "best value" employment metrics - performance audit.

When evaluating electric resource acquisitions and requests for a certificate of convenience and necessity for construction or expansion of generating facilities, including but not limited to pollution control or fuel conversion upgrades and conversion of existing coal-fired plants to natural gas plants, the commission shall consider, in all decisions involved in electric resource acquisition processes, best value regarding employment of Colorado labor, as defined in section 8-17-101 (2)(a), and positive impacts on the long-term economic viability of Colorado communities. To this end, the commission shall require utilities to obtain and provide to the commission the following information regarding "best value" employment metrics: The availability of training programs, including training through apprenticeship programs registered with the United States department of labor's office of apprenticeship or by state apprenticeship councils recognized by that office; employment of Colorado labor as compared to importation of out-of-state workers; long-term career opportunities; and industry-standard wages, health care, and pension benefits. When a utility proposes to construct new facilities of its own, the utility shall supply similar information to the commission.

Any electric resource acquisition decision must be based in part on review of the "best value" employment metrics criteria set forth in any solicitation document. The commission shall not approve any electric resource plan, acquisition, or power purchase agreement that fails to either:

Provide the "best value" employment metrics documentation specified in the solicitation document; or

In the alternative, certify compliance with objective "best value" employment metrics performance standards set forth in the solicitation document.

The commission may waive the requirements of this section if a utility agrees to use a project labor agreement for construction or expansion of a generating facility.

Following development or acquisition of a generating facility by a utility, for all generating facilities owned by the utility that do not emit carbon dioxide, the utility shall use utility employees or qualified contractors if the contractors' employees have access to an apprenticeship program registered with the United States department of labor's office of apprenticeship or by a state apprenticeship council recognized by that office; except that this apprenticeship requirement does not apply to:

The design, planning, or engineering of the infrastructure;

Management functions to operate the infrastructure; or

Any work included in a warranty.

The provisions of this section regarding "best value" employment metrics do not apply to projects involving retail distributed generation, as defined in section 40-2-124 (1)(a)(VIII), 40-2-127 (2)(b)(I)(B), or 40-2-127.5 (2)(a)(II).

The state auditor shall conduct or cause to be conducted a performance audit of the commission's implementation of the "best value" employment metrics requirements of this section, including review of:

The projects subject to subsection (1)(a) of this section that have been approved in the previous ten years;

Whether the work done used contractors that met the criteria specified in this section;

Any shortfalls in enforcement capacity or implementation by the commission;

Current enforcement procedures for investor-owned utilities, independent power producers, and wholesale generation and transmission electric cooperatives; and

Whether and how delayed rule-making proceedings have prevented the "best value" employment metrics requirements of this section from being implemented.

The governor's office, the commission, and commission staff shall cooperate with stakeholders and the state auditor in conducting the audit and making recommendations for reforms of, or potential alternatives to, the implementation and enforcement of "best value" employment metrics.

Upon completion of a performance audit, the state auditor shall submit a written report to the legislative audit committee, together with any findings and recommendations.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1001), ch. 37, p. 150, § 4, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1292), ch. 266, p. 1406, § 16, effective May 24.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3300, § 7, effective May 30.

L. 2020:

(1)(a) and IP(2) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1058, § 71, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(4) added, (HB 21-1266), ch. 411, p. 2751, § 22, effective July 2.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (SB 22-118), ch. 335, p. 2380, § 15, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) For the short title ("Keep Jobs In Colorado Act of 2013") in HB 13-1292, see section 1 of chapter 266, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the short title ("Environmental Justice Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 21-1266, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 411, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

40-2-130. Distributed resources - energy storage systems - definitions - legislative declaration - rules.

Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and determines that:

Colorado's economy, as well as the health and safety of its residents, depends on a reliable and efficient supply of electricity; and

The threat of interruptions in electric supply due to weather, malicious interference, or malfunctions in centralized generation and transmission facilities makes distributed resources, including energy storage systems paired with other distributed resources, an effective way for residents to provide their own reliable and efficient supply of electricity.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that:

It is in the public interest to limit barriers to the installation, interconnection, and use of customer-sited energy storage facilities in Colorado; and

Colorado's consumers of electricity have a right to install, interconnect, and use energy storage systems on their property without the burden of unnecessary restrictions or regulations and without unfair or discriminatory rates or fees.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Energy storage system" means any commercially available, customer-sited system, including batteries and the batteries paired with on-site generation, that is capable of retaining, storing, and delivering energy by chemical, thermal, mechanical, or other means.

"Utility" or "electric utility" means a qualifying retail utility, as described in section 40-2-124 (1); except that the term does not include a municipally owned utility or a cooperative electric association.

Authority of commission - rules. The commission shall adopt rules allowing the installation, interconnection, and use of energy storage systems by customers of utilities. The commission shall incorporate the following principles into the rules:

It is in the public interest to limit barriers to the installation, interconnection, and use of customer-sited energy storage systems in Colorado;

Colorado's consumers of electricity have a right to install, interconnect, and use energy storage systems on their property without the burden of unnecessary restrictions or regulations and without discriminatory rates or fees;

Utility approval processes and any required interconnection reviews of energy storage systems shall be simple, streamlined, and affordable for customers; and

Utilities shall not require the installation of customer-sited meters in addition to a single net energy meter for the purposes of monitoring energy storage systems; except that the commission may authorize the requirement of metering for certain large energy storage systems, as determined by the commission.

Nothing in this section alters or supersedes either:

The principles of net metering as described in section 40-2-124; or

Any existing electrical permit requirements or any licensing or certification requirements for installers, manufacturers, or equipment.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-009), ch. 45, p. 476, § 1, effective August 8.

40-2-131. State of 911 report.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before September 15, 2018, and on or before September 15 of each year thereafter, the commission shall publish a "state of 911" report and submit the report to the members of the general assembly. The report must provide an overall understanding of the state of 911 service in Colorado and must address, at a minimum, the following:

The commission's actions related to 911 service in the state during the previous year as well as planned implementation actions related to 911 service for the upcoming year;

The current statewide structure, technology, and general operations of 911 service in Colorado;

911 network reliability and resiliency;

Identified gaps, vulnerabilities, and needs related to 911 service in the state;

The impact on and involvement of the state in federal activities and national trends affecting 911 service in Colorado;

The state's planning for, transition to, and implementation of next generation 911, including a projected timeline for full statewide implementation; and

A discussion of 911 funding and fiscal outlook, including current funding sources and whether they are adequate for 911 service in the state, and potential funding mechanisms for the transition to and implementation of next generation 911.

In developing the report each year, the commission shall consult with public safety answering points as defined in section 29-11-101 (23), 911 governing bodies as defined in section 29-11-101 (16), and statewide organizations that represent public safety agencies.

On or before February 1, 2019, and on or before February 1 of each year thereafter, the commission shall present the report to the senate committee on business, labor, and technology, or its successor committee, and the house of representatives committee on business affairs and labor or its successor committee.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to grant the commission the authority to regulate any providers or services exempt from jurisdiction under section 40-15-401.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1184), ch. 308, p. 1862, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (HB 20-1293), ch. 267, p. 1298, § 16, effective July 10.

40-2-132. Distribution system planning - definition - rules.

The commission shall promulgate rules establishing the filing of a distribution system plan. The commission's rules must:

Define the following terms:

Distributed energy resources that include:

Distributed renewable electric generation;

Energy storage systems connected to the distribution grid;

Microgrids;

Energy efficiency measures; and

Demand response measures; and

Non-wires alternatives;

Develop a methodology for evaluating the costs and net benefits of using distributed energy resources as non-wires alternatives;

Determine a threshold for the size of a new distribution project, whether in dollars, meters, or another factor, as determined by the commission, for when a qualifying retail utility must consider implementation or use of non-wires alternatives, potentially including energy efficiency measures under utility programs for new electric service to any planned new neighborhoods or housing developments;

Direct each qualifying retail utility to file a distribution system plan;

Determine what shall be included in a distribution system plan, which at a minimum must include the following:

Information regarding:

System and substation historical data;

Peak demand;

Adoption of distributed energy resources; and

Distribution system investments;

To provide new electric service to any planned new neighborhoods or housing developments expected to include more than ten thousand new residences, a description of the qualifying retail utility's consideration of non-wires alternatives, potentially including energy efficiency measures under utility programs;

An updated load forecast that includes any new load resulting from projected or forecasted growth from beneficial electrification programs;

A forecast of the growth of distributed energy resources for the years covered by the plan;

A high-level summary of its planning process for addressing cyber and physical security risks. As part of the summary, the qualifying retail utility need not report any confidential, proprietary, or other information in the plan that could in any way compromise or decrease the qualifying retail utility's ability to prevent, mitigate, or recover from potential system disruptions caused by weather events, physical events, or cyber attacks.

A proposed cost-recovery method or mechanism for any non-wires alternative investments found to be outside the ordinary course of business;

A description of the qualifying retail utility's anticipated new distribution system expansion investments for the years covered by the plan;

A process to evaluate the plan's feasibility and the economic impacts of using non-wires alternatives for certain projects;

An estimate of the year in which peak demand growth or distributed energy resource growth would merit analysis of new non-wires alternative projects; and

Any other information that the commission deems relevant.

The commission shall approve a qualifying retail utility's investment in non-wires alternatives if the commission finds the investment to be in the public interest.

The commission shall determine whether a qualifying retail utility's ratepayers would realize benefits from a non-wires alternative investment and whether the associated costs are just and reasonable.

To evaluate the success of any non-wires alternative investment authorized pursuant to a qualifying retail utility's distribution system plan, the commission may adopt criteria, benchmarks, or accountability mechanisms with which the qualifying retail utility must comply.

As used in this section, "qualifying retail utility" has the meaning described in section 40-2-124 (1); except that the term does not mean a municipally owned utility or a cooperative electric association.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3301, § 8, effective May 30.

40-2-133. Workforce transition planning filing - definition.

A qualifying retail utility regulated by the commission that submits a filing, including a resource plan or application, that includes a proposed accelerated retirement of an electric generating facility shall also include a workforce transition plan as part of its filing.

To the extent practicable, a workforce transition plan must include estimates of:

The number of workers employed by the qualifying retail utility or a contractor of the qualifying retail utility at the electric generating facility, which number must include all workers that directly deliver fuel to the electric generating facility;

The total number of workers whose existing jobs, as a result of the retirement of the electric generating facility:

Will be retained; and

Will be eliminated;

With respect to the workers whose existing jobs will be eliminated due to the retirement of the electric generating facility, the total number and the number by job classification of workers:

Whose employment will end without them being offered other employment;

Who will retire as planned, be offered early retirement, or leave on their own;

Who will be retained by being transferred to other electric generating facilities or offered other employment by the qualifying retail utility; and

Who will be retained to continue to work for the qualifying retail utility in a new job classification; and

If the qualifying retail utility is replacing the electric generating facility being retired with a new electric generating facility, the number of:

Workers from the retired electric generating facility who will be employed at the new electric generating facility; and

Jobs at the new electric generating facility that will be outsourced to contractors or subcontractors.

As used in this section, "qualifying retail utility" has the meaning described in section 40-2-124 (1); except that the term does not mean a municipally owned utility or a cooperative electric association.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3303, § 8, effective May 30.

40-2-134. Wholesale electric cooperatives - electric resource planning - definition - rules.

The commission shall promulgate rules that require each wholesale electric cooperative to submit to the commission an application for approval of an integrated or electric resource plan. The commission shall evaluate a wholesale electric cooperative plan using rules that the commission has adopted that are applicable to wholesale electric cooperatives.

In developing rules for a wholesale electric cooperative, the commission must consider, among other factors determined by the commission, whether each wholesale electric cooperative:

Serves a multistate operational jurisdiction;

Has a not-for-profit ownership structure; and

Has a resource plan that meets the energy policy goals of the state.

As used in this section, "wholesale electric cooperative" means any generation and transmission cooperative electric association that provides wholesale electric service directly to cooperative electric associations.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3304, § 8, effective May 30.

40-2-135. Retail distributed generation - customers' rights - rules.

A retail electric utility customer is entitled to generate, consume, store, and export electricity produced from eligible energy resources to the electric grid through the use of customer-sited retail distributed generation, as defined in section 40-2-124 (1)(a)(VIII), subject to reliability standards, interconnection rules, and procedures, as determined by the commission.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3304, § 9, effective May 30.

40-2-136. Energy storage systems - terms and conditions for installation, interconnection, and use by cooperatives - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly finds and determines that:

Cardinal principles of cooperative electric associations include democratic member control, autonomy, and independence; and

Rapidly evolving technologies in generation, energy storage, and demand management offer cooperative electric associations a variety of options to meet the needs of their members reliably.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that:

It is in the public interest to limit barriers to the installation, interconnection, and use of energy storage systems by cooperative electric associations in Colorado; and

Cooperative electric associations in Colorado should be able to install, interconnect, and use energy storage systems that are connected to the cooperative electric association's electrical system and will not, at any time, flow onto the transmission facilities of a wholesale electric cooperative or other third party without prior agreement as part of meeting their members' needs for reliable, affordable energy without unfair or discriminatory rates or fees.

A wholesale electric cooperative shall not subject the installation, interconnection, or use of an energy storage system by a retail cooperative electric association to any unjust, unreasonable, discriminatory, or preferential charge, classification, contract, fare, fee, practice, rate, regulation, rule, schedule, service, or toll.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Cooperative electric association" means a nonprofit electric corporation or association other than a wholesale electric cooperative.

"Energy storage system" has the meaning set forth in section 40-2-202 (2).

"Wholesale electric cooperative" means any generation and transmission cooperative electric association that provides wholesale electric service directly to cooperative electric associations.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1225), ch. 94, p. 372, § 3, effective March 27.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 20-1225, see section 1 of chapter 94, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

40-2-137. Investor-owned utility electric resource planning - retirement of electric generating facility - commission to consider securitization as means of financing.

For each investor-owned electric utility that submits for commission approval an electric resource plan that includes a portfolio in which an existing electric generating facility in the state would be retired, the commission shall require the investor-owned electric utility to present as part of the resource plan the net present value of revenue requirements for the portfolio based on:

A projection in which the investor-owned electric utility issues CO-EI bonds, as defined in section 40-41-102 (5), to recover, finance, or refinance costs arising from the retirement of the electric generating facility pursuant to the "Colorado Energy Impact Bond Act", article 41 of this title 40; and

A projection in which the investor-owned electric utility does not issue CO-EI bonds.

The commission shall consider the two net present value of revenue requirement options presented by the investor-owned electric utility in its review of the investor-owned electric utility's electric resource plan.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-272), ch. 220, p. 1161, § 7, effective June 10.